District of Columbia statutes.
18-103

Execution of written will; attestation.

A will or testament, other than a will executed in the manner provided by section 18-107 , is void unless it is:

(1)

in writing and signed by the testator, or by another person in his presence and by his express direction; and

(2)

attested and subscribed in the presence of the testator, by at least two credible witnesses.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 686, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1001.06a, § 18-105, and § 18-109.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 18-103.
1973 Ed., § 18-103.